Maryland, session 2026, SB0014.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0014*

SENATE BILL 14
Article – Insurance
15–1208.1.
(c) All small employer health benefit plans shall provide a special enrollment
period during which the following individuals may be enrolled under the health benefit
plan:
(1) an individual who becomes a dependent of the eligible employee
through marriage, birth, adoption, placement for adoption, or placement for foster care;
(2) an eligible employee who acquires a new dependent through marriage,
birth, adoption, placement for adoption, placement for foster care, or through a child
support order or other court order;
(3) the spouse of an eligible employee at the birth or adoption of a child,
placement of a child for foster care, or through a child support order or other court order,
provided the spouse is otherwise eligible for coverage;
(4) at the option of the SHOP Exchange, an enrollee who is the eligible
employee or the spouse of the eligible employee, if:
(i) the enrollee loses a dependent or is no longer considered to be a
dependent due to divorce or legal separation; or
(ii) the employee or the employee’s dependent dies; and
(5) (i) an eligible employee who becomes pregnant, as confirmed by a
health care practitioner; and
(ii) an eligible employee’s spouse or dependent who becomes
pregnant, as confirmed by a health care practitioner, provided the spouse or dependent is
otherwise eligible for coverage.
(f) (1) If an eligible employee enrolls any of the individuals described in
subsection (c)(1) through (4) of this section during the first 31 days of the special enrollment
period, the coverage shall become effective as follows:
(v) in the case of a dependent added due to a child support order or
any other court order:
1. the date the child support order or other court order is
effective; or
2. for SHOP Exchange plans, if ALLOWED BY the SHOP
Exchange [permits] AND SELECTED BY the eligible employee [to select an effective date
based on the date the plan selection is received by the SHOP Exchange:

SENATE BILL 14 3
A.], the first day of the month following receipt of the plan
selection[, if the plan selection is received between the first and fifteenth day, inclusive, of
the month; and
B. the first day of the second month following receipt of the
plan selection, if the plan selection is received between the sixteenth and the last day,
inclusive, of the month].
(g) If the SHOP Exchange [permits] ALLOWS the special enrollment periods
described in subsection (c)(4) of this section, the coverage shall become effective as follows:
(1) for special enrollment periods in the SHOP Exchange due to death of
the employee or dependent[:
(i)], the first day of the month following plan selection; [or
(ii) if the SHOP Exchange permits the eligible employee to select an
effective date based on the date the plan selection is received by the SHOP Exchange:
1. the first day of the month following receipt of the plan
selection, if the plan selection is received between the first and fifteenth day, inclusive, of
the month; and
2. the first day of the second month following receipt of the
plan selection, if the plan selection is received between the sixteenth and the last day,
inclusive, of the month;] and
(2) for special enrollment periods in the SHOP Exchange due to divorce or
legal separation, [if the plan selection is received by the SHOP Exchange:
(i) between the first and fifteenth day, inclusive, of the month,] the
first day of the month following receipt of the plan selection[; and
(ii) between the sixteenth and the last day, inclusive, of the month,
the first day of the second month following receipt of the plan selection].
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.